Illinois, session 104th, HB4932.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5)7    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 8rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 9of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 10will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 11which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 12hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 13laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 14services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 15office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 16home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 17remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 18health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 19clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 20and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 21for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 22to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 23item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or   HB4932- 2 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 2a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 3physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 4dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 5a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 6optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 7diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 8services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 9intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 10disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 11disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 12and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 13adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 14assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 15includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 16referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 17instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 18transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 19(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 20in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 21Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 22sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 23discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 24arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 25treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 26a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice   HB4932- 3 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 2including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 3treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 4of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 5term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 6care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 7treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 9comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 10purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 11approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 12under the medical assistance program under this Article for 13persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 14Article. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 16reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 17shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 18persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 19under this Article. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 21tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 22Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 23tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 24counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 25through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 26the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise   HB4932- 4 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 2shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 3federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 4433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 5through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 6limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 7interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 8administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 9developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 10Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1195.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 12understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 13plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 15Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 16approval.17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 18Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 19for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 20physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 21test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 22other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 23documentation. 24    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 25Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 26shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a   HB4932- 5 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 2enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 3that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 4medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 5managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 6school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 7under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 8individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 9for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 10of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 11the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 12KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 13Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 14payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 15MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 16    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 17and Family Services may provide the following services to 18persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 19participating in education, training or employment programs 20operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 21the Department of Public Aid:22        (1) dental services provided by or under the 23    supervision of a dentist; and 24        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 25    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 26    the person may select.  HB4932- 6 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 2and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 3who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 4assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 5services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 6corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 7the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 8caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 9practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 10supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 11profession.12    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 13set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 14United States District Court for the Northern District of 15Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 16Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 17the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 18than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 19of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 20provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 21assistance program. 22    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 23the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 24deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 25dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 26effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide   HB4932- 7 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 2remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 4subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 5allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 6cost to render dental services through an enrolled 7not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 8enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 9assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 10include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 11Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 12Department, through which dental services covered under this 13Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 14process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 15dental services rendered under this provision. 16    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 17Department shall file administrative rules updating the 18Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 19by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 20    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 21and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 22school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 23delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 24to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 25establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 26and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the   HB4932- 8 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 2published by the Department that establishes the requirements 3for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 4Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 5developing the program requirements to consider the different 6geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 7State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 8provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 9to participate in the school-based dental program administered 10by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 11construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 12district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 13school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 14the school-based dental program administered by the 15Department. 16    On and after January 1, 2027, the reimbursement rates for 17all orthodontic services for children shall be increased 50% 18above the rates in effect on December 31, 2026. The Department 19must do an evaluation of the network adequacy of Medicaid 20providers of orthodontic services statewide, and shall give 21priority consideration to rural/Downstate areas of the State. 22    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 23classify the medical services to be provided only in 24accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 255-2. 26    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must   HB4932- 9 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 2elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 3diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 4short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 5a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 6formula is medically necessary. 7    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 8and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 9mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 10individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 11medical assistance under this Article, as follows:12        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 13    years of age. 14        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 15    age or older.16        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 17    medically necessary by the individual's health care 18    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 19    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 20    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 21    factors.22        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 23    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 24    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 25    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 26    practice medicine in all of its branches.   HB4932- 10 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 2    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 3    all of its branches. 4        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 5    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 6    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 7    or physician assistant. 8        (G) Molecular breast imaging (MBI) and MRI of an 9    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 10    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 11    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 12    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 13    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 14    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 15copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 16coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 17sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 18to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 19health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 20pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 21U.S.C. 223). 22    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 23instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 24frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 25tool.26    For purposes of this Section:  HB4932- 11 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 2diagnostic mammography.3    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 4is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 5an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 6subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 7breast.8    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 9breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 10including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 11image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 12less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 13breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 14includes breast tomosynthesis.15    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 16involves the acquisition of projection images over the 17stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 18three-dimensional images of the breast.19    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 20Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 21agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 22the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 23Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 24would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 25Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 26111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C.   HB4932- 12 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b118031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 2of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 3paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 4tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 5authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 6U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 7for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 8this paragraph.9    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 10that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 11include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 12Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 13Radiology.14    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 15quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 16be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 17same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 18increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 19January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 20breast tomosynthesis.21    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 22representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 23facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 24quality standards for mammography.25    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 26breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved   HB4932- 13 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer 2treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 3program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 4cancer treatment quality program.5    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 6representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 7treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 8doctors, including radiologists that are trained in all forms 9of FDA-approved breast imaging technologies, breast surgeons, 10reconstructive breast surgeons, oncologists, and primary care 11providers to establish quality standards for breast cancer 12treatment.13    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 14establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 15qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 16These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 17hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 18Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 19of the provision set forth in this paragraph.20    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 21individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 22but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 23months, of the importance and benefit of screening 24mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 25cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 26reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating   HB4932- 14 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 2evaluation.3    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 4primary care providers with respect to their female patients 5over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 6goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 7form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 8who meet that goal.9    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 10patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 11cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 12program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 13mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 14site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 15site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 16after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 17include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 18Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 19metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 20be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 21those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 22situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 23    The Department shall require all networks of care to 24develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 25in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 26patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The   HB4932- 15 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1Department shall require all networks of care to include 2access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 3academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 4in-network covered benefit.5    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 6for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 7marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 8persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 9approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 10reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 11persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 12cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 13progression. The Department shall disallow any 14preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 15human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 16    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 17eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 18receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 1912-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 20Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 21conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 22the Department.23    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 24recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 25prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 26disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act,   HB4932- 16 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 2licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 3hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 4The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 5coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 6addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 7Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 8of Human Services. 9    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 10pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 11from the Department on the availability of services under any 12program providing case management services for addicted 13individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 14for other social services that may be needed by addicted 15individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 16    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 17Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 18of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 19a public awareness campaign, may provide information 20concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 21addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 22directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 23to recipients of medical assistance. 24    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 25nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 26recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance   HB4932- 17 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1abuse. 2    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 3governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 4as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 5advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 6the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 7providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 8information dissemination and educational activities for 9medical and health care providers, and consistency in 10procedures to the Illinois Department. 11    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 12Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 13for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 14Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 15projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 16represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 17rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 18Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 19require that the sponsor organization be a medical 20organization. 21    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 22medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 23outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 24alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 25necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 26Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and   HB4932- 18 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 2medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 3in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 4the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 5        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 6    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 7    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 8    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 9    such services. 10        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 11    financial incentives to encourage the development of 12    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 13        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 14    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 15    services above the level usually offered through the 16    medical assistance program. 17    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 18qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 19delivery of high quality medical services. These 20qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 21Department and may be higher than qualifications for 22participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 23sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 24for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 25written approval of the Illinois Department. 26    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of   HB4932- 19 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 2services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 3choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 4all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 5provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 6certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 7Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 8service providers. 9    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 10States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 11implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 12    The Illinois Department shall require health care 13providers to maintain records that document the medical care 14and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 15under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 16of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 17provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 18except that if an audit is initiated within the required 19retention period then the records must be retained until the 20audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 21Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 22make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 23the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 24providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 25Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 26medical services shall be required to maintain and retain   HB4932- 20 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1business and professional records sufficient to fully and 2accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 3the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 4assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 5promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 6regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 7prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 8eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 9each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 10such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 11be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 12such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 13have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 14post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 15basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 16that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 17for which payment is being made are actually being received by 18eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 19(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 20Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 21for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 22medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 23and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 24the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 25updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 26Section 5-5.12.   HB4932- 21 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 2Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 3(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 4procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 5the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 6reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 7procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 8viability of the new system and implement any necessary 9operational or structural changes to its information 10technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 11acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 12    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 13Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 142014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 15procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 16Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 17MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 18purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 19Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 20viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 21operational or structural changes to its information 22technology platforms are implemented. 23    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 24medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 25group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 26Assistance program established under this Article to disclose   HB4932- 22 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 2interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 3associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 4institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 5health care services in this State under this Article. 6    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 7medical services desiring to participate in the medical 8assistance program established under this Article disclose, 9under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 10by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 11regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 12inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 13liens for the Illinois Department. 14    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 15period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 16period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 17the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 18the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 19Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 20disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 21process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 22penalty. 23    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 24enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 25of the vendor.26    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment   HB4932- 23 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 2subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 3the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 4category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 5establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 6which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 7financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 8certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 9unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 10reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 11screening as required by federal or State law.12    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 13by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 14each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 15screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 16federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 17the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 18each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 19hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 20of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 21the conditional enrollment period. 22    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 23payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 24resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 25by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 26later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which   HB4932- 24 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1medical goods or services were provided, with the following 2exceptions:3        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 4    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 5    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 6    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 7    complete.8        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 9    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 10    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 11    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 12    until the provider has been notified of the error.13        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 14    Department initiates the monthly billing process.15        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 16    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 17    when local government funds finance federal participation 18    for claims payments. 19    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 20a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 21filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 22applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 23Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 24to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 25adjudication by the primary payer.26    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120   HB4932- 25 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 2prescreening information, new admissions with associated 3admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 4Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 5Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 6directly to the Department of Human Services using required 7admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 8documents, including all prescreening information, must be 9submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 10to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 11verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 12been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 13rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 14the admission transaction has been completed.15    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 16with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 17payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 18shall have no liability for payment of those claims.19    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 20privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 21agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 22access to confidential and other information and data 23necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 24other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 25limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 26certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage   HB4932- 26 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 2employment; supplemental security income; social security 3numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 4National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 5exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 6corporate information; and death records.7    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 8State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 9into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 10which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 11for medical assistance program integrity functions and 12oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 13cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 14compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 15appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 16minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 17the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 18agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 19agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 20but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 21Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 22Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 23Professional Regulation.24    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 25shall set forth a request for information to identify the 26benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit   HB4932- 27 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 2and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 3rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 4adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 5data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 6clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 7post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 8management system with link analysis. Such a request for 9information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 10or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 11take any action or acquire any products or services. 12    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 13procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 14acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 15devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 16provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 17immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 18and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 19medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 20consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 21the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 22maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 23rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 24alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 25or replacements of any device or equipment previously 26authorized for such recipient by the Department.   HB4932- 28 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 2the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 3wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 4wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 5and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 6methods other than actual acquisition costs.7    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 8durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 9organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 10Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 11bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 12recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 13of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 14must meet the accreditation requirement.15    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 16needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 17cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 18under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 19managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 20of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 21equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 22orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 23Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 24products and associated services) through the State's 25assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 26staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP)   HB4932- 29 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 2(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 3costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 4(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 5cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 6federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 7governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 8settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 9enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 10recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 11similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 12refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 13of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 14be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 15new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 16authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 17organizations. 18    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 19prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 20Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 21effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 22eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 23non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 24development of non-institutional services in areas of the 25State where they are not currently available or are 26undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of   HB4932- 30 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 2increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 337 for applicants for institutional and home and 4community-based long term care; if and only if federal 5approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 6with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 7or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 8amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 92013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 10institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 11(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 12permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 13for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 14receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 15to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 16Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 17agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 18institutional and home and community-based long term care 19interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 20implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 21community-based services in circumstances where federal 22approval has been granted. 23    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 24cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 25compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 26appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation   HB4932- 31 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 2services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 3medical assistance under this Code. 4    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 5General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 61979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 7        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 8    medical services by public aid recipients; 9        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 10    the various medical services by medical vendors; 11        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 12    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 13        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 14    Illinois Department. 15    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 16ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 17include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 18Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 19Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 20required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 21Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 22Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 23as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 24Library Act. 25    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 26any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance   HB4932- 32 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 2Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 3Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 4whatever reason, is unauthorized. 5    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 6rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 7any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 8of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 9with Section 5-5e. 10    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 11cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 12necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 13of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 14cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 15renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 16benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 17of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 18requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 19under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 20kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 21emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 22Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 23certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 24and the services under this Section shall be limited to 25services associated with kidney transplantation. 26    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the   HB4932- 33 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved forms of 2medication assisted treatment prescribed for the treatment of 3alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid dependence shall be 4covered under both fee-for-service and managed care medical 5assistance programs for persons who are otherwise eligible for 6medical assistance under this Article and shall not be subject 7to any (1) utilization control, other than those established 8under the American Society of Addiction Medicine patient 9placement criteria, (2) prior authorization mandate, (3) 10lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) limitations on 11dosage. 12    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 13for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 14medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 15fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 16and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 17under the medical assistance program for persons who are 18otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 19As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 20binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 21opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 22to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 23approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 24Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 25provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 26assistance program.  HB4932- 34 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 2coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 3marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 4are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 5United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 6pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 7services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 8transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 9transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 10counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 11individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 12risk of HIV infection.13    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 141905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 15reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 16qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 17to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 18dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 19Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 20dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 21    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 22of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 23approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 24family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 25to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 26poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective   HB4932- 35 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1beginning no later than December 1, 2022.2    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 3and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 4electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 5(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 6I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 7Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 8(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 9the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 10become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 11subject to criteria established in accordance with all 12applicable laws.13    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 14community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 15interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 16assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 17Palliative Care Act.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 1912 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 20102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 21services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 22Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 23or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 24program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 25State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 26paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including   HB4932- 36 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 3medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 4reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 5screening test for the presence of metachromatic 6leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 7Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 8Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 9provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 10subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 11hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 12tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 13Public Act 103-909) to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and 14required to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than 15the fee charged by the Department of Public Health. The 16Department shall seek federal approval before the 17implementation of the newborn screening test fees by the 18Department of Public Health. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 20beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 21cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 22person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 23impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 24Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 25under the medical assistance program for persons who are 26otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article.   HB4932- 37 -LRB104 19771 KTG 33221 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 2medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 3to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 4medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 5eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 6this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 7performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 8restore physical appearance. 9    Subject to federal approval, for dates of services on and 10after January 1, 2026, over-the-counter choline dietary 11supplements for pregnant persons shall be covered under the 12medical assistance program. 13(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 1-1-24; 14103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 151-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 16Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 90, 17Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-808, eff. 181-1-26; 103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; 104-9, 19eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2027.